West Virginia, session 2025, HB2820.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. west virginia medical practice act. §30-3-21. Patient right to refuse observation by residents and medical students. (A) - Patients may refuse residents and medical students from observing or performing medical care on them. Each hospital shall implement a policy to ensure that patients are informed of their right to refuse such observations.